Maine, session 132, LD1363.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5111, first ¶, as amended by PL 1999, c. 731, Pt. T, §1, is
further amended to read:
A tax is imposed for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, on the
Maine taxable income of every resident individual of this State who is 18 years of age or
older. The amount of the tax is determined as provided in this section.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5121, as amended by PL 2019, c. 379, Pt. C, §2, is further
amended to read:
§5121. Maine taxable income
The Maine taxable income of a resident individual 18 years of age or older is equal to
the individual's federal adjusted gross income with the modifications and less the
deductions and personal exemptions provided in this chapter. The income of a resident
individual under 18 years of age is not taxable, either to the individual or, if that individual
can be claimed as a dependent of another taxpayer, to that taxpayer.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶AAA is enacted to read:
AAA. For income tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, to the extent
included in federal adjusted gross income and not otherwise removed from Maine
taxable income, an amount equal to the income earned by a dependent of the taxpayer
if that dependent is under 18 years of age.